local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="gradonačelni/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="knji/ga__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gom</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gama</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gama</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gama</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="studen/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tom</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tima</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tima</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tima</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
    <pardef n="deča/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>če</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="knjiga"><i>knji</i><par n="knji/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="istraga"><i>istra</i><par n="knji/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prečaga"><i>preča</i><par n="knji/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sloga"><i>slo</i><par n="knji/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snaga"><i>sna</i><par n="knji/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gradonačelnik"><i>gradonačelni</i><par n="gradonačelni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="đak"><i>đa</i><par n="deča/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="otok"><i>oto</i><par n="deča/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="student"><i>studen</i><par n="studen/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dečak"><i>deča</i><par n="deča/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jezik"><i>jezi</i><par n="deča/k__n"/></e>
